District of Columbia statutes.
7-732

Repealed

Regulatory Enforcement Fund.

Repealed.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4903, 48 DCR 6981
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(g), 50 DCR 6913
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 1602, 50 DCR 5668
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 45, 51 DCR 881
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9079, 58 DCR 6226
Short title of title XVI of Law 15-39: Section 1601 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title XVI of the act may be cited as the Department of Health Functions Clarification Amendment Act of 2003.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1602 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(g) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1602 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 4403 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3 of Department of Health Functions Clarification Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-60, June 6, 2001, 48 DCR 5701).
This section is referenced in § 7-733.01 and § 7-743.